Maryland, session 2025, HB0867.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Health Occupations
14–5F–01.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(b) “Approved naturopathic medical program” means a naturopathic medical
education program:
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0867*

HOUSE BILL 867
(1) In the United States that:
(i) Provides the degree of Doctor of Naturopathy or Doctor of
Naturopathic Medicine;
(ii) Offers a 4–year graduate–level, full–time didactic and
supervised clinical training;
(iii) Is accredited, or has achieved candidacy status for accreditation,
by the Council on Naturopathic Medical Education or an equivalent federally and
Board–recognized accrediting body for naturopathic medical programs; and
(iv) Is part of an institution of higher education that is either
accredited, or is a candidate for accreditation, by a regional or national institutional
accrediting agency recognized by the United States Secretary of Education; or
(2) In a diploma–granting, degree–equivalent college or university in
Canada that:
(i) Offers graduate–level, full–time didactic and supervised clinical
training;
(ii) Is accredited, or has achieved candidacy status for accreditation,
by the Council on Naturopathic Medical Education or an equivalent federally and
Board–recognized accrediting body for naturopathic medical programs; and
(iii) Has provincial approval for participation in government–funded
student aid programs.
(c) “Auto–injectable epinephrine” means a portable, disposable drug delivery
device that contains a premeasured single dose of epinephrine that is used to treat
anaphylaxis in an emergency situation.
(d) “Board” means the State Board of Physicians.
(e) “Committee” means the Naturopathic Medicine Advisory Committee.
[(f) “Council” means the Naturopathic Doctors Formulary Council.]
[(g)] (F) (1) “Device” means a device used in the diagnosis, treatment, or
prevention of disease.
(2) “Device” does not include:
(i) Any surgical or dental instrument;

HOUSE BILL 867 3
(ii) Any physical therapy equipment;
(iii) Any X–ray apparatus; or
(iv) Any component part or accessory of any of the items listed in
items (i) through (iii) of this paragraph.
[(h) “Formulary” means a list of drugs and devices developed and adopted in
accordance with § 14–5F–04.1 of this subtitle.]
[(i)] (G) “Licensed naturopathic doctor” means a naturopathic doctor who is
licensed to practice naturopathic medicine.
[(j)] (H) “Naturopathic doctor” means an individual who practices naturopathic
medicine.
[(k)] (I) (1) “Naturopathic medicine” means the prevention, diagnosis, and
treatment of human health conditions, injury, and disease using only patient education and
naturopathic therapies and therapeutic substances recognized by the Council of
Naturopathic Medical Education.
(2) “Naturopathic medicine” includes:
(i) Counseling;
(ii) The practice of the mechanical sciences of healing, including
mechanotherapy, articular manipulation, corrective and orthopedic gymnastics,
hydrotherapy, electrotherapy, and phototherapy;
(iii) The practice of the material sciences of healing, including
nutrition, phytotherapy, treatment by natural substances, and external applications; and
(iv) Prescribing, dispensing, or administering nonprescription and
prescription drugs and devices [listed in the formulary] AS AUTHORIZED UNDER THIS
TITLE.
[(l)] (J) “Naturopathic musculoskeletal mobilization” means the treatment by
manual and other mechanical means of all body tissues exclusive of high–velocity thrusts
at or beyond the end range of normal joint motion.
[(m)] (K) “Nonprescription drug” means a drug that:
(1) May be sold without a prescription; and
(2) Is labeled for use by a consumer in accordance with State and federal
law.

HOUSE BILL 867
[(n)] (L) “Prescription drug” means any drug defined in § 503(b) of the federal
Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act if the drug’s label is required to bear the statement “Rx only”.
[14–5F–04.1.
(a) (1) There is a Naturopathic Doctors Formulary Council within the Board.
(2) The Council consists of the following members:
(i) The Deputy Secretary of Public Health Services, or the Deputy
Secretary’s designee; and
(ii) The following members, appointed by the Board:
1. Two individuals who:
A. Practice naturopathic medicine in the State;
B. Are certified by the North American Board of
Naturopathic Examiners;
C. Have a minimum of 2 years experience; and
D. Are licensed naturopathic doctors;
2. Two licensed physicians who practice in the State;
3. One pharmacist who has a background in pharmacognosy
and who practices in the State; and
4. One consumer.
(3) (i) The term of an appointed member is 4 years.
(ii) At the end of a term, an appointed member continues to serve
until a successor is appointed.
(4) A member of the Council:
(i) May not receive compensation as a member of the Council; but
(ii) Is entitled to reimbursement for expenses under the Standard
State Travel Regulations, as provided in the State budget.
(5) The Board shall designate the chair of the Council.

HOUSE BILL 867 5
(6) The Board shall provide staff for the Council.
(b) The Council shall:
(1) Develop and recommend to the Board a formulary for use by licensed
naturopathic doctors;
(2) Annually review the formulary adopted by the Board under subsection
(c) of this section to determine if any changes are necessary for compliance with current
prescribing standards or the practice of naturopathic medicine;
(3) Otherwise review the formulary at the direction of the Board; and
(4) Make recommendations to the Board based on the reviews conducted
under items (2) and (3) of this subsection.
(c) (1) The Board shall adopt a formulary based on the recommendations of
the Council made under subsection (b) of this section.
(2) The Board may modify or reject any recommendation of the Council
regarding the formulary.
(d) (1) The formulary adopted by the Board shall include:
(i) Nonprescription drugs and devices;
(ii) Prescription oxygen and auto–injectable epinephrine; and
(iii) Prescription diaphragms and cervical caps for contraception.
(2) The formulary may not include:
(i) Except as provided in paragraph (1)(ii) and (iii) of this subsection,
prescription drugs or devices; or
(ii) Controlled substances.]
14–5F–14.
(a) A license authorizes a licensee, consistent with naturopathic education and
training and competence demonstrated by passing the naturopathic physician licensing
examination, to:
(1) Order and perform physical and laboratory examinations for diagnostic
purposes, including phlebotomy, clinical laboratory tests, orificial examinations,
electrocardiograms with over read by a cardiologist, and physiological function tests;

HOUSE BILL 867
(2) Order diagnostic imaging studies and interpret the reports of diagnostic
imaging studies;
(3) Dispense or order natural medicines of mineral, animal, or botanical
origin, including food, extracts of food, nutraceuticals, vitamins, amino acids, minerals,
enzymes, botanicals and their extracts, botanical medicines, homeopathic medicines, and
all dietary supplements and nonprescription drugs [listed in the formulary] that use
various routes of administration, including oral, nasal, auricular, ocular, rectal, vaginal,
transdermal, [and] intramuscular, SUBCUTANEOUS, AND INTRAVENOUS;
(4) Administer natural medicines of mineral, animal, or botanical origin,
including food, extracts of food, nutraceuticals, vitamins, amino acids, minerals, enzymes,
botanicals and their extracts, botanical medicines, homeopathic medicines, and all dietary
supplements and nonprescription drugs [listed in the formulary] using various routes of
administration, including oral, nasal, auricular, ocular, rectal, vaginal, [and] transdermal,
INTRAMUSCULAR, SUBCUTANEOUS, AND INTRAVENOUS;
(5) Administer auto–injectable epinephrine;
(6) Administer or perform hot or cold hydrotherapy, naturopathic physical
medicine, electromagnetic energy, and therapeutic exercise for the purpose of providing
basic therapeutic care services, except that if a referral to another licensed provider is
appropriate for ongoing rehabilitation or habilitation services, the naturopathic doctor shall
make the referral;
(7) Provide health education and health counseling; [and]
(8) Perform naturopathic musculoskeletal mobilization; AND
(9) PRESCRIBE WITHIN THE SCOPE OF NATUROPATHIC MEDICINE:
(I) A PRESCRIPTION DRUG; AND
(II) A SCHEDULE III, SCHEDULE IV, OR SCHEDULE V
CONTROLLED DANGEROUS SUBSTANCE.
(b) A license does not authorize a licensee to:
(1) Except for a prescription drug [or device included in the formulary
under § 14–5F–04.1(d)(1)(ii) or (iii) of this subtitle] DESCRIBED IN SUBSECTION (A)(9)
OF THIS SECTION, prescribe, dispense, or administer any prescription drug or device OR
A SCHEDULE II CONTROLLED DANGEROUS SUBSTANCE;
(2) Perform surgical procedures;

HOUSE BILL 867 7
(3) Practice or claim to practice as a medical doctor or physician, an
osteopath, a dentist, a podiatrist, an optometrist, a psychologist, a nurse practitioner, a
physician assistant, a chiropractor, a physical therapist, an acupuncturist, or any other
health care professional unless licensed under this article;
(4) Use general or spinal anesthetics;
(5) Administer ionizing radioactive substances for therapeutic purposes;
(6) Perform chiropractic adjustments or manipulations that include
high–velocity thrusts at or beyond the end range of normal joint motion unless the licensee
is also a licensed chiropractor;
(7) Perform acupuncture unless the licensee is also a licensed
acupuncturist; or
(8) Prescribe, dispense, or administer any prescription or nonprescription
drug or device [listed in the formulary] for cosmetic purposes.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.